en: pregelatinized wheat starch
de: Weizenquellstärke
fr: amidon de blé prégélatinisé
hr: preželatinizirani pšenični škrob
it: amido di frumento pregelatinizzato

en: tapioca syrup
bg: сироп от тапиока
de: Tapiokasirup
es: sirope de tapioca, jarabe de tapioca
fr: sirop de tapioca
hr: sirup od tapioke
it: Sciroppo di Tapioca
nl: tapiocastroop

en: rice starch
bg: оризово нишесте
cs: rýžový škrob
da: risstivelse
de: Reisstärke
es: almidon de arroz, amido de arroz
fi: riisitärkkelys
fr: amidon de riz
hr: rižin škrob
hu: rizskeményítő
it: amido di riso
lt: Ryžių krakmolas
nl: rijstzetmeel
pl: Skrobia ryżowa
pt: amido de arroz
ru: Крупа рисовая, крупа рисовая шлифованная
sv: risstärkelse

en: modified rice starch
bg: модифицирано оризово нишесте
de: modifizierte Reisstärke
es: almidón modificado de arroz
fi: muunnettu riisitärkkelys
fr: amidon de riz modifié, amidon transformé de riz, amidons transformés de riz, amidon modifié de riz
hr: modificirani rižin škrob
hu: módosított rizskeményítő
it: amido modificato di riso
nl: gemodificeerd rijstzetmeel, getransformeerd rijst zetmeel
pt: amido de arroz modificado
ru: Рисовый крахмал
sv: modifierad risstärkelse, modifierad stärkelse av ris

en: pea starch
bg: грахово нишесте
da: Ærtestivelse
de: Erbsenstärke
el: Άμυλο μπιζελιού
es: almidon de guisante
et: Herne tärklis
fi: hernetärkkelys
fr: Amidon de pois
hr: škrob od graška, škrob graška
it: amido di pisello, amido di piselli
lv: Zirņu ciete
nl: erwtenzetmeel
no: Ærtestivelse
pl: skrobia grochowa, skrobia z grochu, skrobi grochowej, skrobi z grochu
pt: Amido de ervilha
ru: Гороховый крахмал
sl: Škrob graha
sv: ärtstärkelse

en: barley starch
bg: ечемично нишесте
de: Gerstenstärke
fi: ohratärkkelys
fr: amidon d'orge
hr: ječmeni škrob
it: amido d'orzo, amido (orzo), amido orzo
sv: kornstärkelse

en: Sago
ar: ساغو
be: Сага
bn: সাগু
ca: Sagú
cs: Ságo
da: Sago
de: Sago
dv: ސާގު
eo: Saguo
es: Sagú
et: Saago
eu: Sago
fa: ساگو
fi: Saago
fr: Sagou
gu: સાબુદાણા
hi: साबूदाना
hr: sago
id: Sagu
io: Saguto
is: Sagó
it: Sago
ja: サゴヤシ, サゴ
jv: Sagu
kk: Саго
kn: ಸಬ್ಬಕ್ಕಿ
ko: 사고
la: Sagum
lt: Sagas
ml: പനനൂറ്
mr: साबुदाणा
ms: Sagu
nl: Sago
no: Sago
pl: Sago
pt: Sagu
ru: Саго
su: Sagu
sv: Sago
ta: சவ்வரிசி
te: సగ్గుబియ్యం
tl: Sago
uk: Саго
vi: Sago
zh: 西米

en: oil and fat, oils and fats
bg: масла и мазнини
ca: Oli i greix, olis i greixos, matèria grassa, M.G.
cs: oleji a tuky
da: olier og fedtstoffer, Olie og fedt
de: Speiseöle und -fette, Öle und Fette
el: έλαια και λίπη, Έλαια και λιπαρά
es: aceites y grasas, materia grasa
et: õlid ja rasvad
fi: öljy ja rasva, öljyt ja rasvat
fr: huiles et graisses, huile et graisse
he: שמן ושומן
hr: ulja i masti
hu: Olajok és zsírok, olaj és zsír
it: oli e grassi
lt: Aliejus ir riebalai
lv: Eļļas un tauki
mt: żjut u xaħmijiet
nb: olje og fett, oljer of fett
nl: oliën en vetten, vetstoffen
no: Olje og fett
pl: oleje i tłuszcze, tłuszcze i oleje
pt: óleo e gordura, óleos e gorduras, óleo e lípido, óleos e lípidos
ro: uleiuri și grăsimi
ru: растительным и животным жирам, Масла и жиры
sk: Oleje a tuky
sl: olja in maščobe
sv: oljor och fetter, oljor och fett, olja och fett
uk: Олія і жир

en: vegetable oil and fat, vegetable fat and oil
bg: растително масло и мазнина, растителни мазнини и масла
ca: Oli i greix vegetal
cs: Rostlinný olej a tuk
da: vegetabilsk olie og fedt, vegetabilsk fedt og olie
de: pflanzliche Öle und Fette
el: Φυτικά έλαια και λίπη
es: aceites y grasas vegetales
et: taimsed rasvad ja õlid
fi: kasviöljy ja -rasva, kasviöljyt ja -rasvat, kasvirasva ja -öljy
fr: huiles et graisses végétales, graisses et huiles végétales, graisse et huile végétales, huiles et matières grasses végétales, huile et graisses végétales, huile et graisse végétale, graisse et huiles végétales, huile et graisse végétales, graisses et huile végétales, huiles végétales hydrogénées et non hydrogénées
he: שומן ושמן מן הצומח
hr: biljna ulja i masnoće, biljna ulja i masti
hu: növényi olaj és zsír
it: oli e grassi vegetali, olio e grasso vegetale
ja: 植物油脂
lv: Augu eļļas un tauki
mt: xaħam u żejt veġetali
nb: grønnsaksolje og fett, vegetabilsk olje og fett
nl: plantaardige vetten en olie, plantaardige oliën en vetten
pl: tłuszcze i oleje roślinne, oleje i tłuszcze roślinne
pt: gordura e óleo vegetais, gorduras e óleos vegetais, lípido e óleo vegetais, lípidos e óleos vegetais
ru: Растительные масла и жиры
sv: Vegetabilisk olja och fett, vegetabiliskt fett och olja, vegetabiliskt fett och oljor

en: refined vegetable oil
bg: рафинирано растително масло, рафинирана растителна мазнина
de: Raffinierte pflanzliche Öle, raffinierte Pflanzenöle
es: grasas vegetales refinadas, aceite vegetal refinado
hr: rafinirano biljno ulje
it: olio vegetale raffinato
pl: rafinowany olej roślinny, olej roślinny rafinowany, oleje roślinne rafinowane
pt: óleo vegetal refinado

en: oil, cooking oil
ak: nwo
an: Aceite
ar: زيت
az: Yağ
bg: олио
bn: তেল
br: Eoul
bs: Ulje
ca: oli
cs: olej
cy: Olew
da: Olie
de: Öl, Speiseöl, Öle
el: Λάδι, Έλαιο
eo: oleo
es: aceite, aceites
et: Õli
eu: Olio
fa: روغن
fi: öljy, ruokaöljy
fr: huile, huiles, huile de cuisine
ga: Ola
gd: Ola
gl: Aceite
he: שמן
hr: ulja, Ulje
ht: Lwil
hu: olaj, olajok
hy: յուղ
id: minyak
io: Oleo
is: Olía
it: olio
ja: 油
jv: Lenga
kg: Mafuta
kn: ಎಣ್ಣೆ
ko: 기름
ln: Mafúta
lo: ນ້ຳມັນ
lt: Aliejus
lv: eļļa
mg: Menaka
mk: масло
ml: എണ്ണ
ms: Minyak
my: ဆီ
nb: olje
nl: olie, oliën
nn: olje
oc: Òli
pa: ਤੇਲ
pl: oleje, olej, oleju
pt: óleo
ro: Ulei
ru: масло, масла
sa: तैलम्
sh: Ulje
si: තෙල්
sk: Olej
sl: Olje
so: Saliid
sr: уље
su: Minyak
sv: olja
sw: Mafuta
ta: எண்ணெய்
te: నూనె
th: น้ำมัน
tl: Langis
tr: yağ
tt: Näft
uk: Олія
ur: تیل
uz: Moy
vi: dầu
wa: ôle
yi: בוימל
yo: Epo
zh: 油

en: hydrogenated oil
bg: хидрогенирано олио
de: gehärtetes öl
es: aceite hidrogenado
fi: kovetettu öljy, hydrogenoitu öljy
fr: Huile hydrogénée
hr: hidrogenirano ulje
hu: hidrogénezett olaj
it: olio idrogenato
nb: hydrogenert olje
nl: Gehydrogeneerde olie

en: frying oil
bg: олио за пържене
da: stegeolie
de: Frittieröl
es: aceite para freír
fi: paistoöljy, friteerausöljy
fr: Huile de friture, Huile pour friture
hr: ulje za prženje
hu: sütőolaj
it: olio per friggere
nl: bakvet

en: fat, fats
af: vet
ak: sradeɛ
an: graixa
ar: دهن
ay: lik'i
bg: мазнина, мазнини
bn: স্নেহ পদার্থ
br: druzoni
ca: greix
cs: tuky, tuk
cy: braster
da: fedtstof, fedt
de: Fett, Backfett
el: λίπος, λιπαρός
eo: graso
es: gordo, grasa, reduccion, manteca
et: rasvad
eu: koipe
fa: چربی
fi: rasva, rasvat
fr: matière grasse, matières grasses, graisse, graisse alimentaire, graisses alimentaires
ga: saill
gl: greix
gu: ચરબી
he: שומן
hi: वसा
hr: mast, masti, masni namaz, masni namaz 70% masti
ht: kò gra
hu: zsír, zsírok
id: lemak
it: grasso, grassi, grasso alimentare
ja: 脂肪, ショートニング
jv: gajih
ka: ცხიმი
kk: май
kn: ಕೊಬ್ಬು
ko: 지방
la: pingue
li: vèt
lv: tauki
mk: масти
ml: കൊഴുപ്പ്
mr: चरबी
ms: lemak
mt: xaħam
nb: fett
nl: vet
nn: feitt
pl: tłuszcz, tłuszcze
pt: gordura, gorduras, lípido, lípidos
qu: wira
ro: grăsime
ru: жиры, жир, жир специального назначения, жир кондитерский, кондитерский жир, жир кондитрерский
sd: چرٻي
sh: mast
si: මේදය
sl: maščobe, maščoba, maščob
so: dux
sq: yndyra
sr: масти
su: lemak
sv: fett, fet, matfett, fetter
ta: கொழுப்பு
te: కొలెస్టరాల్‌
th: ไขมัน
tr: şişman
uk: жири
ur: شحم
vi: chất béo
zh: 脂肪

en: hydrogenated fat
bg: хидрогенирано масло
de: hydriertes Fett
es: grasa hidrogenada
fi: kovetettu rasva, hydrogenoitu rasva
fr: graisse hydrogénée
hr: hidrogenirana mast
hu: hidrogénezett zsír
it: grassi idrogenati
nb: hydrogenert fett
nl: gehydrogeneerd vet
pl: tłuszcz uwodorniony, tłuszcze uwodornione

en: fully hydrogenated fat
bg: напълно хидрогенирана мазнина, напълно хидрогенирано масло
cs: plně ztužený tuk
da: helt hærdet fedt, helt haerdet fedt
de: komplett hydriertes Fett
es: grasa totalmente hidrogenada
fi: kokonaan kovetettu rasva, kokonaan hydrogenoitu rasva
fr: graisse totalement hydrogénée
hr: potpuno hidrogenizirane masti
hu: teljesen hidrogénezett zsír
it: grassi totalmente idrogenati
nl: volledig gehydrogeneerde vet
pl: tłuszcz całkowicie uwodorniony, tłuszcze całkowicie uwodornione

en: animal fat
an: Saín
ar: دهن حيواني
bg: животинска мазнина
ca: sagí
da: Animalsk fedt
de: Tierfett, tierisches Fett
es: Grasa animal
eu: Gantz
fi: Eläinrasva
fr: Graisse animale
hr: masno tkivo
hu: állati zsiradék, állati zsír, állati eredetű zsír
hy: Կենդանական յուղ
it: grassi animali, grasso animale
ja: 動物性脂肪
kk: Жануар майы
ko: 동물성 기름
ln: Mpɔ́ngɔ
nl: dierlijk vet
pl: tłuszcz zwierzęcy, tłuszcze zwierzęce
pt: Gordura animal, gorduras animal, lípido animal, lípidos animal
ru: Животные жиры
sv: Animaliskt fett
tr: Hayvansal yağ
uk: Тваринні жири
zh: 動物脂肪

en: bacon grease, bacon fat
da: baconfedt

en: suet
de: Nierenfett
hr: loj
it: grasso di rognone

en: sheeps fat
bg: овча мазнина
de: Schafsfett
fi: lampaanrasva
fr: gras de mouton, gras d'ovin
hr: ovčja mast
hu: juhzsír, birkazsír
it: grasso di pecora
nl: schaapsvet